District of Columbia statutes.
1-1151.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-104, § 2, 54 DCR 12218
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(f), 59 DCR 1862
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Exploratory Committee Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-2, April 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 6581).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Exploratory Committee Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-13, January 29, 2007, 54 DCR 1520).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(f) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).